Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 19 Gambling and Lotteries
11-19-32.1.
Senior citizens housing — Bingo allowed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, any organization of senior citizens may promote, carry on or conduct within their own senior citizens housing project, a bingo game, with total daily prizes not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400). The game shall be for recreational purposes and shall be open only to senior citizens who are residents of the housing project where the game is held and their guests. Bingo games shall be limited to three (3) days per calendar week and shall be operated and managed solely by residents of the housing projects. Admission to a bingo game shall only be by admission ticket which may be purchased only by a resident. Each resident shall be allowed to purchase one ticket for a guest. The guest ticket must clearly indicate that the holder is a guest and must be purchased at least three (3) hours prior to the start of the bingo game.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 453, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 531, § 1.

11-19-32.2.
Senior citizens’ center — Bingo allowed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, any organization which operates a public senior citizens center or senior center may obtain a permit approved by the department to conduct bingo games in said senior citizens center or senior center for up to five (5) calendar days per week, excluding Sundays.

As used herein, the terms “senior citizens center” or “senior center” means an organization whose goal is the promotion of various recreational and educational activities to senior citizens and which receives a combination of federal, state, municipal and private funds to provide such services at a community facility.

A senior citizens center or senior center may conduct bingo games if it complies with all of the following requirements:

All bingo games are conducted only on the premises of the center’s facility;

All participants are age fifty-five (55) years of age or older; provided, this shall not prohibit a person who is less than fifty-five (55) years of age from assisting a senior citizen in playing the game;

All bingo game operators are sixty (60) years of age or older and receive no compensation for serving as operators;

The total daily prizes shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400); and

All proceeds of the game shall be limited in use to the following:

To pay winners monetary prizes;

To defray any costs directly related to conducting the games; and/or

To defray costs of services the center’s facility provides.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 515, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 529, § 1.

11-19-33.
Bingo games — Announcement of prizes.

Prior to each drawing or contest conducted in any game of “bingo” or “beano” as provided in this chapter, the sponsor shall announce or cause to be announced openly and clearly, so as to provide the participants with a clear understanding of the amount to be paid as a prize for each individual drawing or contest in any game of “bingo” or “beano” as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2.

11-19-34.
Use of name of charitable organization to conduct permitted games of chance.

A charitable organization, within the provisions of §

11-19-30

or

11-19-31

, shall not allow or permit any individual, partnership, corporation, or any other entity to utilize the name of the charitable organization for the purpose of conducting or promoting bingo or other permitted games of chance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 1.

11-19-34.1.
Senior citizens housing — Raffles allowed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, any organization of senior citizens may promote, carry on, or conduct within their own senior citizens housing project, a lottery, commonly known as a raffle, with total prizes not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). Raffles shall be for recreational purposes and shall be open only to senior citizens who are residents of the housing project where the game is held. Raffles shall be limited to three (3) times per year and shall be operated and managed solely by residents of the housing projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 257, § 1.

11-19-35.
Pull-tab lottery tickets.

The Rhode Island lottery is empowered to sell and regulate the sale of pull-tab lottery tickets to religious, fraternal, civic, educational, veterans’, or charitable organizations. The lottery shall determine, consistent with this section, those organizations that are authorized to sell pull-tab lottery tickets. As part of such determination, the Rhode Island lottery shall require criminal background checks of the applicant and any individual the lottery deems appropriate and said individuals shall apply to the bureau of criminal investigation of the Rhode Island state police or the Rhode Island department of the attorney general for a national criminal records check with fingerprinting. The individual whose criminal records check is being conducted shall be responsible for the payment of the costs of said criminal records check. The Rhode Island state police or the Rhode Island department of attorney general, as applicable, shall send the results of such criminal check to the Rhode Island lottery. Once said results are sent to and received by the Rhode Island Lottery, the Rhode Island state police and the Rhode Island department of attorney general shall promptly destroy said fingerprint record(s). On or before February 1, 2011, the agency shall adopt rules and regulations establishing criteria to be used in determining whether based upon a criminal records check an application will be approved.

The lottery shall insure that the pull tab lottery tickets to be distributed are secured for the purposes under which they are to be sold in terms of concealing the result of the tickets until the time that they are sold to the general public. Consistent with this section, those organizations authorized to sell the tickets are authorized to retain net profits as shall have been provided for by the commission.

Notwithstanding any other section of the general laws to the contrary, pull-tab lottery tickets authorized by this section are declared to be legal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 252, § 1.

11-19-36.
Organizations permitted to conduct other permitted games of chance.

Any charitable organization may promote, carry on, or conduct any permitted game of chance authorized by the division of state police in connection with which prizes or prize monies are offered or awarded, provided as follows:

The game is conducted by members of the organization.

No person in the actual or constructive management and control of the game receives any compensation for services connected to the game.

The entire net receipts of the game, including the charges for admission to and participation in the game, are applied solely to the bona fide charitable purposes of the organization.

That the organization is granted a license issued pursuant to the provisions of §

11-19-37

.

That the provisions of this section shall not apply to that lottery commonly known as a “twenty-week club” or a raffle conducted by a charitable organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 1.

11-19-37.
Issuance of licenses.

Any charitable organization within the provisions of §§

11-19-30

and/or

11-19-31

may be granted a license to conduct the game of bingo or other permitted game of chance authorized by the department.

Bingo. A license for the game of bingo shall be obtained as follows:

The charitable organization shall annually apply for approval to the department pursuant to §

11-19-31

and shall pay to the department an application fee of five dollars ($5.00).

Upon the receipt of notification of approval from the department, the charitable organization shall apply to the local licensing authorities upon forms furnished and pay the local licensing fee, if any;

The local licensing authority shall issue the license. A copy of the license shall be forwarded to the department by the local licensing authority;

The local licensing authority shall issue the license for a specific date or dates or a specific day or days during each calendar week;

Within seven (7) calendar days of the completion of every game of bingo, the charitable organization shall file a financial report, upon forms furnished by the department with the department and with the local licensing authority if it so requires.

Other permitted games of chance.

The charitable organization shall apply for approval to the department pursuant to this section and shall pay to the department an application fee of five dollars ($5.00).

Upon the receipt of a notification of approval from the department, the charitable organization shall apply to the local licensing authority upon forms furnished by the department and pay the local licensing fee, if any;

The local licensing authority shall issue the license. A copy of the license shall be forwarded to the department by the local licensing authority;

The local licensing authority shall issue the license for a specific date or specific day or days;

The application for the local license shall be made at least thirty (30) days prior to the date or day for which the license is issued;

Within thirty (30) calendar days of the completion of the permitted game of chance, the charitable organization shall file a financial report upon forms furnished by the department, with the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 45, § 1.

11-19-38.
Change of information.

If, subsequent to approval by the department pursuant to §

11-19-31

, there is a change in any information furnished by the organization to the department, the organization shall so inform the department within seven (7) days of the change. Failure to inform the department within seven (7) days will result in the automatic suspension of approval for a period of three (3) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2.

11-19-39.
Enforcement and penalties.

If any charitable organization fails to file any registration application or statement, report, or other information required to be filed by the department under this chapter, or otherwise violates the provisions of this chapter, the department shall notify the delinquent charitable organization, by mailing a notice, certified mail, with return receipt requested, to its last known address. If the required registration application or statement, annual report, or other information is not filed or if the existing violation is not discontinued within ten (10) days after the formal notification or receipt of the notice, the department may cancel, suspend the registration, or refuse to accept a delinquent report from the charitable organization.

The department, upon its own motion or upon complaint of any person, may, if it has reasonable ground to suspect a violation, investigate any charitable organization, to determine whether it has violated the provisions of this chapter or has filed any application or other information required under this chapter which contains false or misleading statements. If the department finds that any application or other information contains false or misleading statements, or that a registrant under this chapter has violated its provisions, the registration may be suspended or cancelled. Any person whose registration is suspended or cancelled may, within fifteen (15) days from the date of written notification of the suspension or cancellation request in writing, a hearing before the department. This hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days from the date of the request. Any person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available within the department in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act (chapter 35 of title 42), and who is aggrieved by a final decision of the department, is entitled to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act (chapter 35 of title 42).

The certificate of approval of any charitable organization which knowingly makes a false or misleading statement in any registration application or statement, report, or other information required to be filed by the department or this chapter shall be revoked.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates any provisions of this chapter, or who shall willfully and knowingly give false or incorrect information to the department in filing statements or reports required by this chapter, whether the report or statement is verified or not, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, that person shall be sentenced for the first offense to pay a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or undergo imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. For the second and any subsequent offense, that person shall pay a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or undergo imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

Whenever the attorney general shall have reason to believe or the attorney general has been advised by the director (who shall have given due notice and full hearing to the charitable organization) that the charitable organization: (1) is operating in violation of the provision of this chapter; (2) has knowingly and willfully made any false statements in any initial or any renewal application or in any other information required to be filed by this chapter; (3) has failed to file a registration statement required by this chapter; (4) there is employed or is about to be employed by a charitable organization any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud or to obtain money or property by means of any false pretense, representation, or promise; (5) the officers or representatives of any charitable organization failed after notice to produce any records of the organization; or (6) the funds raised by the game are not devoted or will not be devoted to the charitable purposes of the charitable organization; in addition to all other actions authorized by law, the attorney general of the state of Rhode Island may bring an action in the name of the state of Rhode Island against the charitable organization and its officers, or any other person who has violated this chapter to enjoin that charitable organization or person from continuing the violation or doing any acts in furtherance of it, and for any other relief that the court deems appropriate. The court may make any additional orders and/or judgments that may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any monies or property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of any practice in this chapter declared to be unlawful. The department may refuse to grant an initial application to conduct a game, may refuse to renew an application, and may revoke a registration of any charitable organization which knowingly makes a false statement in any initial registration application or renewal application or statement, annual report, or other information required to be filed by the department or the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2.

11-19-40.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt and issue rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of §§

11-19-30

—

11-19-40

. These rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42.

In promulgating the rules and regulations, the director shall, in addition to the standards set forth in other provisions of this chapter, be guided by the following standards setting forth conduct, conditions and activity deemed undesirable:

Fraud. The practice of any fraud or deception upon a participant in a permitted game of chance;

Unsafe premises. The conduct of permitted games of chance in, at or upon premises which may be unsafe due to fire hazard or other conditions;

Charitable funds. To assure that all the funds raised through bingo and permitted charitable games are maintained and expended for bona fide charitable purposes;

Advertising. That advertising for all permitted games of chance and bingo is conducted in accordance with rules and regulations.

The director may promulgate less stringent regulations for those charitable organizations that do not intend to run any permitted games more than once in any consecutive six (6) month period, and also for those charitable organizations where the prize for any permitted game will not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 1.

11-19-41.
Police regulation of bingo and permitted games of chance.

The division of state police shall have the power and authority to license, regulate, supervise and exercise general control over the operation of bingo and permitted games of chance including, but not limited to, the conduct of permitted games of chance, the distribution of prizes, and the use and licensing of equipment specifically designed to be utilized to conduct bingo and permitted games of chance, as well as the licensing of persons, firms, corporations in the business of the sale and rental of equipment concerning bingo and permitted games of chance. The Rhode Island state police shall have the power and authority to investigate as to the direct or indirect ownership or control of any licenses and to revoke or suspend any license for just cause after a hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 1.

11-19-42.
Forfeiture of charter rights and privileges.

Upon conviction for a violation of this chapter or upon revocation of a certificate of approval, the attorney general may apply to the superior court:

For the forfeiture of any charter rights, franchise privileges or powers of the corporation held by the convicted person under the laws of this state;

For dissolution, if the person is a corporation or limited partnership organized under the laws of this state; or

For the suspension of the privilege to exist within this state.

The court, after giving due consideration to the public interest and to relevant competitive and economic circumstances, may grant as much of the requested relief as is deemed appropriate. A dissolution shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures specified by law for either voluntary or judicial dissolution of the particular type of corporation, association, firm, or partnership.

If any corporation, association, partnership, or limited partnership shall be dissolved or have its privilege to exist in this state suspended or revoked as provided in subsection (a) of this section, no assignee, transferee, or successor-in-interest of the corporation, association, partnership, or limited partnership shall be permitted to incorporate or to transact business in this state without first applying to the court for and receiving an order permitting incorporation or transaction of business. No order shall be granted unless the applicant proves to the satisfaction of the court that it will conduct its affairs in accordance with all applicable laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2.

11-19-43.
Acts of officers, directors, representatives, or agents acting within the scope of their authority.

A corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership is liable for the acts of its officers, directors, representatives, or agents acting within the scope of their authority. Proof of the acts of any officer, director, representative, or agent shall be received as prima facie proof of the acts of the corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership itself.

When a corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership violates this chapter, the violation shall be deemed to be that of the individual directors, members, officers, managers, employees, or agents of the corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership who knowingly authorized, ordered, aided, abetted, or advised in the acts or omissions constituting in whole or in part the violation, whether the individuals acted on their own behalf and for their own benefit, or for the corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership and in their representative capacity. The individuals, in their capacity as individuals, are subject to the provisions of this chapter and may be joined, if subject to personal jurisdiction, as additional parties defendant in the proceedings against the corporation, association, partnership, or limited partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2.

11-19-44.
Remedies cumulative.

The remedies provided in this chapter are cumulative of each other and of existing powers and remedies inherent in the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2.

11-19-45.
Severability.

If any section of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the chapter and the application of the section to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected. The invalidity or unconstitutionality of any section or sections or part of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this chapter and to this end the sections of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2.